South Dakota, session 2026, SB140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 23A-28B-40 be AMENDED:
23A-28B-40. There is established within the state treasury the crime victims'
compensation fund, into which shall be is deposited surcharges collected pursuant to
§ 23A-28B-42, interest earned pursuant to section 4 of this Act, deductions from prison
industries revenues or inmate wages pursuant to subdivision 24-7-3(1), contributions,
grants, payments ordered by the court, interest received on moneys in the fund, and all
other fees and moneys collected for the purposes of this chapter. This fund shall may be
used only for the purposes of paying compensation awards and, administering the crime
victims' compensation program, as provided for in this chapter. The fund may also be
used, and reimbursing a law enforcement agency or law enforcement officer, as provided
in § 23A-28B-40.1.
Section 2. That § 24-2-29 be AMENDED:
24-2-29. Each An inmate is liable for court-ordered fines, costs, fees, sanctions,
and restitution and; any obligation incurred while under the jurisdiction of the Department
of Corrections, including those provided for in §§ 24-2-28, 24-7-3, 24-8-9, 24-15-11, 24-
15A-24, and 23A-35B-4; and any other charge owed to the state. Disbursement shall
Except as provided in section 4 of this Act, disbursement must be made from an inmate's
institutional account to defray the inmate's obligation, regardless of the source of the
inmate's funds moneys, including moneys in the inmate's institutional account pursuant
to § 24-2-5 and wages earned by the inmate pursuant to §§ 24-4-9, 24-7-3(3), 24-7-6,
and 24-8-8.
Section 3. That § 24-4-9 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.153.9 2 140
24-4-9. The warden may authorize monetary compensation to inmates for work
performed under the provisions of § 24-4-7. The amount authorized may not be less than
one dollar and twenty-five cents per hour.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 24-4:
A correctional facility official shall deposit twenty-five percent of all compensation
earned by an inmate under the official's custody, pursuant to this chapter, in a personal
savings account for the inmate. Moneys deposited in the inmate's personal savings
account may not be disbursed to defray any obligation pursuant to § 24-2-29.
Upon discharge of an inmate from a correctional facility, whether by parole,
suspended sentence, or final discharge, a correctional facility official shall disburse the
balance of the personal savings account to the inmate.
On a quarterly basis, a correctional facility official shall deposit into the crime
victims' compensation fund any interest accrued from funds deposited in the inmate's
personal savings account.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.